Washington statutes.
RCW 19.72.170

Bonds not to fail for want of form or substance.

No bond required by law, and intended as such bond, shall be void for want of form or substance, recital, or condition; nor shall the principal or surety on such account be discharged, but all the parties thereto shall be held and bound to the full extent contemplated by the law requiring the same, to the amount specified in such bond. In all actions on such defective bond, the plaintiff may state its legal effect, in the same manner as though it were a perfect bond.

[Code 1881 s 749; 1854 p 219 s 489; RRS s 777. Formerly RCW 10.19.120, part.] [SLC-RO-10.]